Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.1245, is amended to read: 16A.1245 PROMPT PAYMENT TO SUBCONTRACTORS. new text begin (a) new text end Each state agency contract must require the prime contractor to pay any subcontractor within ten days of the prime contractor's receipt of payment from the state for undisputed services provided by the subcontractor. The contract must require the prime contractor to pay interest of 1-1/2 percent per month or any part of a month to the subcontractor on any undisputed amount not paid on time to the subcontractor. The minimum monthly interest penalty payment for an unpaid balance of $100 or more is $10. For an unpaid balance of less than $100, the prime contractor shall pay the actual penalty due to the subcontractor. A subcontractor who prevails in a civil action to collect interest penalties from a prime contractor must be awarded its costs and disbursements, including attorney's fees, incurred in bringing the action.new text begin If the judgment is uncollectible because the prime contractor has gone out of business or declared bankruptcy, and the state agency has contract retainage funds, the state agency is authorized to pay a subcontractor who prevailed, up to the principal amount of the work performed by the subcontractor, from the retainage. If the retainage is insufficient to pay one or more subcontractors, the state agency is authorized to dispense pro rata shares of the retainage to subcontractors, based on the principal amounts due and owing.new text end new text begin (b) If a state agency does not require a performance and payment bond, letter of credit, or other financial mechanism to ensure that a prime contractor will pay subcontractors, the state agency must pay all subcontractors directly during the term of the contract, upon satisfactory completion of work under the contract. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2025. new text end